Alabama, session 2026rs, HB407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) MISS ALABAMA. The individual selected and
recognized by the Miss Alabama Organization to hold the title
of Miss Alabama for an annual term.
(2) OFFICIAL STATE AMBASSADOR. An honorary
representative designated to promote goodwill and civic
engagement and to serve as a public representation of the
State of Alabama.
(3) STATE AGENCY. Any department, board, bureau,
commission, or office of the State of Alabama, including the
Office of the Governor.
(b)(1) Miss Alabama is an Official State Ambassador for
the State of Alabama during her term as Miss Alabama.
(2) The designation of Official State Ambassador shall
only apply during the individual's term as the recognized Miss
Alabama.
(3) Upon the selection of a new Miss Alabama, the
designation shall automatically transfer to the new individual
Page 1

designation shall automatically transfer to the new individual
HB407 Enrolled
recognized as Miss Alabama.
(c) An Official State Ambassador, upon invitation or
coordination with a state agency, may perform the following
duties:
(1) Represent the State of Alabama at ceremonial,
educational, civic, tourism-related, and economic development
events.
(2) Promote Alabama's communities, culture, history,
workforce, military families, and public-service initiatives.
(3) Encourage volunteerism, civic engagement, and
charitable service throughout the state.
(4) Serve as a goodwill representative of the state at
national or international events when appropriate.
(d) Participation by an Official State Ambassador in
any activity authorized by this section shall be voluntary.
(e)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize compensation, salary, stipend, benefits, or
reimbursement of expenses to an Official State Ambassador.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant
policymaking authority, regulatory authority, or
decision-making authority to an Official State Ambassador.
(f)(1) A state agency may coordinate with an Official
State Ambassador for appearances, outreach efforts, and public
engagement activities that are consistent with the mission of
the agency.
(2) Nothing in this section requires a state agency to
request or utilize the services of an Official State
Ambassador.
Page 2

Ambassador.
HB407 Enrolled
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB407 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 4